Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-608
Licensed practitioner, defined.

Licensed practitioner means any physician licensed to practice pursuant to the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, whose practice includes obstetrics.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1746;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 220.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.